Louisiana, session 2026, HB62.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2525(D)(introductory paragraph), (11), and (12) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:2525(D)(13) and (14) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2525. Louisiana Women's Policy and Research Commission
* * *
D. The commission shall consist of a maximum of twenty-five twenty-seven
members. The thirteen members serving pursuant to Paragraph (12) (14) of this
Subsection shall be appointed by the governor, subject to Senate confirmation, and
serve terms concurrent with the appointing governor. The commission shall be
reflective of all geographic regions of the state and, as much as possible, shall consist
of the following members:
* * *
(11) The secretary of Louisiana of Economic Development or the secretary's
designee.
(12) The secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs or the secretary's
designee.
(13) A representative from the Child Care Association of Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 62 ENROLLED
(14) Thirteen Louisiana women who have significant academic or
professional expertise in one or more of the following areas:
(a) Business or industry.
(b) Economics.
(c) Education.
(d) Demographics.
(e) Public health.
(f) Law.
(g) Social science or social work.
(h) Violence against women.
(i) Gender studies.
(j) (i) Youth organization focused solely on girls.
(k) (j) Women's organization.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.